Utah, session 2026, HB371.
Section 1. Section 53C-5-101 is amended to read:53C-5-101. Management of range resources.(1)The director is responsible for the efficient management of all range resources on lands under the director's administration, consistent with the director's fiduciary duties of financial support to the beneficiaries.(2)The director shall:(a)prioritize the principles of multiple use and sustained yield in the management of trust lands; and(b)base management of trust lands on sound resource management principles.(2)This management shall be based on sound resource management principles.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53C-5-102 is amended to read:53C-5-102. Grazing permits -- Treatment of permits on federal lands required by the state.(1)(a)The director may issue grazing permits on trust lands under terms and conditions established by rules of the director.(b)Those terms shall be basedThe director shall base the terms of a grazing permit on the fair market value of the permitgrazing use of the trust lands.(c)The director may not issue a permit for the non-use of trust lands if grazing is a viable use of the trust lands.(2)(a)Upon selecting, exchanging, or otherwise acquiring lands of the United States, the director shall honor, for the remainder of the applicable term, all leases, permits, and contracts, and the related terms and conditions of user agreements on United States lands, including permitted stocking rates, grazing fee levels, access rights, and all existing activities that currently or historically have dictated an understanding of usage between the land user and the federal government.(b)Improvements of the permittee or lessee to the land shall be honored by the state in the acquisition of federal lands.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.